Nebraska, session 109, LB906.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 5 of this act:
(1) Appropriate identification means items that display both of the
following:
(a) The law enforcement officer's name and badge number; and
(b) The full name or initials of the law enforcement officer's
employing law enforcement agency;
(2) Covert operation means an operation during which a law
enforcement officer must conceal the officer's identity or purpose to
investigate and gather evidence of criminal activity;
(3) Facial covering means any opaque mask, garment, helmet,
headgear, or other item that conceals or obscures the facial identity of
an individual, including, but not limited to, a balaclava, tactical mask,
gator, ski mask, or any similar type of facial covering or face-shielding
item;
(4) Law enforcement agency means:
(a) The police department or the town marshal in incorporated
municipalities, the office of sheriff in unincorporated areas, the
Nebraska State Patrol, and Class I railroad police departments;
(b) Any law enforcement agency of another state;
(c) Any federal law enforcement agency; and
(d) A tribal police department;
(5) Law enforcement officer means:
(a) A law enforcement officer as defined in section 81-1401;
(b) A federal law enforcement officer;
(c) A member of the National Guard on active service by direction of
the Governor during a period of emergency or civil disorder;
(d) A member of a tribal police department or federal law
enforcement officer duly authorized to assert law enforcement powers by a
tribe in the State of Nebraska; and
(e) Any person acting on behalf of, or in concert with, any law
enforcement officer described in subdivision (5)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of
-2-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
this section; and
(6) Personal disguise means any alteration of an individual's
appearance with the intent to conceal the individual's identity or
mislead others.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares:
(1) That the routine use of facial coverings by law enforcement
officers has significant implications for public perception, officer-
community interactions, and accountability;
(2) Whether intended or not, members of the public may experience
fear or intimidation when approached by officers whose faces are
obscured. This perception can heighten defensive behaviors and
unnecessarily escalate situations;
(3) Facial coverings limit the visibility of facial expressions,
which are essential components of nonverbal communication. In high-stress
or emotionally charged interactions, the inability to read an officer's
expression may lead to misinterpretation of tone or intent, increasing
the risk of conflict escalation;
(4) The visibility of an officer's face is vital for promoting
transparency, facilitating communication, and building trust between law
enforcement agencies and the communities they serve;
(5) When officers are not readily identifiable, it increases the
risk of impersonation by unauthorized individuals, which further
undermines public trust, endangers public safety, and hinders legitimate
law enforcement operations; and
(6) The use of facial coverings by law enforcement should not
obscure officer identity or hinder accountability, nor should those
coverings be used in a manner that enables or conceals discriminatory or
unlawful conduct.
Sec. 3. (1) Except as provided under subsections (2) and (3) of
this section, a law enforcement officer, while operating in this state
and in the performance of the officer's duties, shall wear appropriate
-3-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
identification and shall not wear a facial covering or personal disguise.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a law
enforcement officer engaged in a covert or undercover operation.
(3) A law enforcement officer may wear a facial covering in any of
the following circumstances:
(a) To prevent the officer from contracting an airborne disease, the
officer may wear a mask or respirator that is designed to prevent the
transmission of airborne disease;
(b) To protect against exposure to bodily fluids, an officer may
wear a facial covering designed to prevent such exposure;
(c) To protect the officer from smoke, an airborne toxin, gas, or
any other particulate matter or irritant that could impair health or
trigger illness in an individual, whether immediately or in the future,
the officer may wear a mask, helmet, device, respirator, or other
equipment that provides such protection;
(d) To protect the officer from physical harm while engaged in high-
risk situations, including, but not limited to, a shootout, standoff,
hostage-taking situation, or terrorist situation, the officer may wear a
mask, helmet, or face shield that provides physical protection;
(e) An officer may wear a translucent face shield or clear mask that
does not conceal the wearer's facial identity;
(f) An officer may wear a mask, helmet, or device, including, but
not limited to, a self-contained breathing apparatus, when necessary for
underwater activities;
(g) An officer may wear a motorcycle helmet when operating a
motorcycle or other vehicle that requires a helmet for safe operations;
and
(h) An officer may wear eyewear necessary to protect from the use of
retinal weapons, including, but not limited to, lasers.
(4) A violation of this section is a Class III misdemeanor. This
penalty shall not apply if the law enforcement officer's law enforcement
-4-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
agency has adopted a policy in compliance with section 4 of this act.
Sec. 4. By October 1, 2026, each law enforcement agency operating
in Nebraska shall maintain and publicly post a written policy regarding
the use of facial coverings and personal disguises that is consistent
with the requirements of section 3 of this act. Pursuant to such policy,
a supervisor shall not knowingly allow a law enforcement officer under
his or her supervision to violate such policy or section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
in any civil or criminal proceeding, any evidence collected by a law
enforcement officer while such officer was in violation of section 3 of
this act shall be inadmissible, and such officer shall not be permitted
to testify as to any matters occurring while such officer was in
violation of section 3 of this act.
(2) This section does not apply to a law enforcement officer
testifying in his or her own defense or when due process would otherwise
require the admission of evidence or testimony otherwise prohibited under
this section.
Sec. 6. Section 13-910, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-910 The Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections
16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610 shall not apply to:
(1) Any claim based upon an act or omission of an employee of a
political subdivision, exercising due care, in the execution of a
statute, ordinance, or officially adopted resolution, rule, or
regulation, whether or not such statute, ordinance, resolution, rule, or
regulation is valid;
(2) Any claim based upon the exercise or performance of or the
failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or duty on the
part of the political subdivision or an employee of the political
subdivision, whether or not the discretion is abused;
(3) Any claim based upon the failure to make an inspection or making
-5-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
an inadequate or negligent inspection of any property other than property
owned by or leased to such political subdivision to determine whether the
property complies with or violates any statute, ordinance, rule, or
regulation or contains a hazard to public health or safety unless the
political subdivision had reasonable notice of such hazard or the failure
to inspect or inadequate or negligent inspection constitutes a reckless
disregard for public health or safety;
(4) Any claim based upon the issuance, denial, suspension, or
revocation of or failure or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke
any permit, license, certificate, or order. Nothing in this subdivision
shall be construed to limit a political subdivision's liability for any
claim based upon the negligent execution by an employee of the political
subdivision in the issuance of a certificate of title under the Motor
Vehicle Certificate of Title Act and the State Boat Act except when such
title is issued upon an application filed electronically by an approved
licensed dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system
pursuant to section 60-1507;
(5) Any claim arising with respect to the assessment or collection
of any tax or fee or the detention of any goods or merchandise by any law
enforcement officer;
(6) Any claim caused by the imposition or establishment of a
quarantine by the state or a political subdivision, whether such
quarantine relates to persons or property;
(7) Any claim arising out of assault, battery, false arrest, false
imprisonment, malicious prosecution, abuse of process, libel, slander,
misrepresentation, deceit, or interference with contract rights, except
that this subdivision does not apply to a claim:
(a) Under under the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act;
or
(b) Based on conduct of a law enforcement officer while such officer
was in violation of section 3 of this act;
-6-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
(8) Any claim by an employee of the political subdivision which is
covered by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act;
(9) Any claim arising out of the malfunction, destruction, or
unauthorized removal of any traffic or road sign, signal, or warning
device unless it is not corrected by the political subdivision
responsible within a reasonable time after actual or constructive notice
of such malfunction, destruction, or removal. Nothing in this subdivision
shall give rise to liability arising from an act or omission of any
political subdivision in placing or removing any traffic or road signs,
signals, or warning devices when such placement or removal is the result
of a discretionary act of the political subdivision;
(10) Any claim arising out of snow or ice conditions or other
temporary conditions caused by nature on any highway as defined in
section 60-624, bridge, public thoroughfare, or other public place due to
weather conditions. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
limit a political subdivision's liability for any claim arising out of
the operation of a motor vehicle by an employee of the political
subdivision while acting within the course and scope of his or her
employment by the political subdivision;
(11) Any claim arising out of the plan or design for the
construction of or an improvement to any highway as defined in such
section or bridge, either in original construction or any improvement
thereto, if the plan or design is approved in advance of the construction
or improvement by the governing body of the political subdivision or some
other body or employee exercising discretionary authority to give such
approval;
(12) Any claim arising out of the alleged insufficiency or want of
repair of any highway as defined in such section, bridge, or other public
thoroughfare. Insufficiency or want of repair shall be construed to refer
to the general or overall condition and shall not refer to a spot or
localized defect. A political subdivision shall be deemed to waive its
-7-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
immunity for a claim due to a spot or localized defect only if (a) the
political subdivision has had actual or constructive notice of the defect
within a reasonable time to allow repair prior to the incident giving
rise to the claim or (b) the claim arose during the time specified in a
notice provided by the political subdivision pursuant to subsection (3)
of section 39-1359 and the state or political subdivision had actual or
constructive notice; or
(13)(a) Any claim relating to recreational activities for which no
fee is charged (i) resulting from the inherent risk of the recreational
activity, (ii) arising out of a spot or localized defect of the premises
unless the spot or localized defect is not corrected by the political
subdivision leasing, owning, or in control of the premises within a
reasonable time after actual or constructive notice of the spot or
localized defect, or (iii) arising out of the design of a skatepark or
bicycle motocross park constructed for purposes of skateboarding, inline
skating, bicycling, or scootering that was constructed or reconstructed,
reasonably and in good faith, in accordance with generally recognized
engineering or safety standards or design theories in existence at the
time of the construction or reconstruction. For purposes of this
subdivision, a political subdivision shall be charged with constructive
notice only when the failure to discover the spot or localized defect of
the premises is the result of gross negligence.
(b) For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Recreational activities include, but are not limited to, whether
as a participant or spectator: Hunting, fishing, swimming, boating,
camping, picnicking, hiking, walking, running, horseback riding, use of
trails, nature study, waterskiing, winter sports, use of playground
equipment, biking, roller blading, skateboarding, golfing, athletic
contests; visiting, viewing, or enjoying entertainment events, festivals,
or historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites; and similar
leisure activities;
-8-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
(ii) Inherent risk of recreational activities means those risks that
are characteristic of, intrinsic to, or an integral part of the activity;
(iii) Gross negligence means the absence of even slight care in the
performance of a duty involving an unreasonable risk of harm; and
(iv) Fee means a fee to participate in or be a spectator at a
recreational activity. A fee shall include payment by the claimant to any
person or organization other than the political subdivision only to the
extent the political subdivision retains control over the premises or the
activity. A fee shall not include payment of a fee or charge for parking
or vehicle entry.
(c) This subdivision, and not subdivision (3) of this section, shall
apply to any claim arising from the inspection or failure to make an
inspection or negligent inspection of premises owned or leased by the
political subdivision and used for recreational activities.
Sec. 7. Section 81-8,219, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,219 The State Tort Claims Act shall not apply to:
(1) Any claim based upon an act or omission of an employee of the
state, exercising due care, in the execution of a statute, rule, or
regulation, whether or not such statute, rule, or regulation is valid, or
based upon the exercise or performance or the failure to exercise or
perform a discretionary function or duty on the part of a state agency or
an employee of the state, whether or not the discretion is abused;
(2) Any claim arising with respect to the assessment or collection
of any tax or fee, or the detention of any goods or merchandise by any
law enforcement officer;
(3) Any claim for damages caused by the imposition or establishment
of a quarantine by the state whether such quarantine relates to persons
or property;
(4) Any claim arising out of assault, battery, false imprisonment,
false arrest, malicious prosecution, abuse of process, libel, slander, or
-9-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
interference with contract rights, except that this subdivision does not
apply to a claim:
(a) Under under the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act;
or
(b) Based on conduct of a law enforcement officer while such officer
was in violation of section 3 of this act;
(5) Any claim arising out of misrepresentation or deceit, except
that, in cases of adoption or placement, the State Tort Claims Act shall
apply to a claim arising out of misrepresentation or deceit by the
Department of Health and Human Services in failing to warn, notify, or
inform of a ward's mental and behavioral health history, educational
history, and medical history, including any history as a victim or
perpetrator of sexual abuse;
(6) Any claim by an employee of the state which is covered by the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act;
(7) Any claim based on activities of the Nebraska National Guard
when such claim is cognizable under the Federal Tort Claims Act, 28
U.S.C. 2674, or the federal National Guard Claims Act, 32 U.S.C. 715, or
when such claim accrues as a result of active federal service or state
service at the call of the Governor for quelling riots and civil
disturbances;
(8) Any claim based upon the failure to make an inspection or making
an inadequate or negligent inspection of any property other than property
owned by or leased to the state to determine whether the property
complies with or violates any statute, ordinance, rule, or regulation or
contains a hazard to public health or safety unless the state had
reasonable notice of such hazard or the failure to inspect or inadequate
or negligent inspection constitutes a reckless disregard for public
health or safety;
(9) Any claim based upon the issuance, denial, suspension, or
revocation of or failure or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke
-10-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
any permit, license, certificate, or order. Such claim shall also not be
filed against a state employee acting within the scope of his or her
office. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the
state's liability for any claim based upon the negligent execution by a
state employee in the issuance of a certificate of title under the Motor
Vehicle Certificate of Title Act and the State Boat Act except when such
title is issued upon an application filed electronically by an approved
licensed dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system
pursuant to section 60-1507;
(10) Any claim arising out of the malfunction, destruction, or
unauthorized removal of any traffic or road sign, signal, or warning
device unless it is not corrected by the governmental entity responsible
within a reasonable time after actual or constructive notice of such
malfunction, destruction, or removal. Nothing in this subdivision shall
give rise to liability arising from an act or omission of any
governmental entity in placing or removing any traffic or road signs,
signals, or warning devices when such placement or removal is the result
of a discretionary act of the governmental entity;
(11) Any claim arising out of snow or ice conditions or other
temporary conditions caused by nature on any highway as defined in
section 60-624, bridge, public thoroughfare, or other state-owned public
place due to weather conditions. Nothing in this subdivision shall be
construed to limit the state's liability for any claim arising out of the
operation of a motor vehicle by an employee of the state while acting
within the course and scope of his or her employment by the state;
(12) Any claim arising out of the plan or design for the
construction of or an improvement to any highway as defined in such
section or bridge, either in original construction or any improvement
thereto, if the plan or design is approved in advance of the construction
or improvement by the governing body of the governmental entity or some
other body or employee exercising discretionary authority to give such
-11-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
approval;
(13) Any claim arising out of the alleged insufficiency or want of
repair of any highway as defined in such section, bridge, or other public
thoroughfare. Insufficiency or want of repair shall be construed to refer
to the general or overall condition and shall not refer to a spot or
localized defect. The state shall be deemed to waive its immunity for a
claim due to a spot or localized defect only if the state has had actual
or constructive notice of the defect within a reasonable time to allow
repair prior to the incident giving rise to the claim;
(14)(a) Any claim relating to recreational activities on property
leased, owned, or controlled by the state for which no fee is charged (i)
resulting from the inherent risk of the recreational activity, (ii)
arising out of a spot or localized defect of the premises unless the spot
or localized defect is not corrected within a reasonable time after
actual or constructive notice of the spot or localized defect, or (iii)
arising out of the design of a skatepark or bicycle motocross park
constructed for purposes of skateboarding, inline skating, bicycling, or
scootering that was constructed or reconstructed, reasonably and in good
faith, in accordance with generally recognized engineering or safety
standards or design theories in existence at the time of the construction
or reconstruction. For purposes of this subdivision, the state shall be
charged with constructive notice only when the failure to discover the
spot or localized defect of the premises is the result of gross
negligence.
(b) For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Recreational activities include, but are not limited to, whether
as a participant or spectator: Hunting, fishing, swimming, boating,
camping, picnicking, hiking, walking, running, horseback riding, use of
trails, nature study, waterskiing, winter sports, use of playground
equipment, biking, roller blading, skateboarding, golfing, athletic
contests; visiting, viewing, or enjoying entertainment events, festivals,
-12-

LB906 LB906
2026 2026
or historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites; and similar
leisure activities;
(ii) Inherent risk of recreational activities means those risks that
are characteristic of, intrinsic to, or an integral part of the activity;
(iii) Gross negligence means the absence of even slight care in the
performance of a duty involving an unreasonable risk of harm; and
(iv) Fee means a fee to participate in or be a spectator at a
recreational activity. A fee shall include payment by the claimant to any
person or organization other than the state only to the extent the state
retains control over the premises or the activity. A fee shall not
include payment of a fee or charge for parking or vehicle entry.
(c) This subdivision, and not subdivision (8) of this section, shall
apply to any claim arising from the inspection or failure to make an
inspection or negligent inspection of premises owned or leased by the
state and used for recreational activities; or
(15) Any claim arising as a result of a special event during a
period of time specified in a notice provided by a political subdivision
pursuant to subsection (3) of section 39-1359.
Sec. 8. Original sections 13-910 and 81-8,219, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-13-